Florida, session 2026, HB1239.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
21
22 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Safe Students and
23 Survivors Act."
24 Section 2. Paragraph (o) is added to subsection (4) of
25 section 1001.42, Florida Statutes, to read:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1239 2026
26 1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
27 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
28 powers and perform all duties listed below:
29 (4) ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND OPERATION OF
30 SCHOOLS.—Adopt and provide for the execution of plans for the
31 establishment, organization, and operation of the schools of the
32 district, including, but not limited to, the following:
33 (o) Sexual assault response liaison.—Shall appoint a
34 districtwide sexual assault response liaison who shall connect
35 students with law enforcement, counseling, and advocacy services
36 in response to a sexual assault. The Department of Health shall
37 administer training and materials based on recommendations and
38 training guidelines provided by the Florida Council Against
39 Sexual Violence for such liaisons.
40 Section 3. Section 1003.08, Florida Statutes, is created
41 to read:
42 1003.08 The Safe Students and Survivors Grant Program.—
43 (1) Subject to legislative funding, there is established
44 the Safe Students and Survivors Grant Program to be administered
45 by the Department of Education. The program shall provide grants
46 to school districts, charter schools, and private schools that
47 receive public funding through a state scholarship program under
48 chapter 1002 to partner with local nonprofit organizations and
49 advocacy centers to provide student workshops and instructional
50 personnel training on the prevention of sexual assaults and
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1239 2026
51 sexual assault survivor support programs.
52 (2) The department shall:
53 (a) Create an application and award criteria.
54 (b) Establish reporting requirements for school districts,
55 charter schools, and private schools participating in the
56 program.
57 (c) Annually provide a report to the President of the
58 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on the
59 program.
60 (3) School districts, charter schools, and private schools
61 shall provide a report to the department, in a format prescribed
62 by the department and consistent with privacy laws and
63 standards, on the use of a grant award.
64 (4) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
65 administer this section.
66 Section 4. Paragraph (o) of subsection (2) of section
67 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
68 1003.42 Required instruction.—
69 (2) Members of the instructional staff of the public
70 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education
71 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and
72 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the
73 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy,
74 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing
75 approved methods of instruction, the following:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1239 2026
76 (o) Comprehensive age-appropriate and developmentally
77 appropriate K-12 instruction on:
78 1. Health education that addresses concepts of community
79 health, consumer health, environmental health, and family life,
80 including:
81 a. Injury prevention and safety.
82 b. Internet safety.
83 c. Nutrition.
84 d. Personal health.
85 e. Prevention and control of disease.
86 f. Substance use and abuse.
87 g. Prevention of child sexual abuse, exploitation, and
88 human trafficking.
89 2. For students in grades 7 through 12, teen dating
90 violence and abuse, sexual assault prevention, and consent. This
91 component must include, but not be limited to, all of the
92 following:
93 a. The definitions definition of dating violence and abuse
94 and sexual assault, including recognizing abusive behavior.,
95 b. The warning signs of dating violence, and abusive
96 behavior, and sexual assault.,
97 c. The characteristics of healthy relationships.,
98 d. Measures to prevent and stop dating violence and
99 abuse., and
100 e. Community resources available to victims of dating
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1239 2026
101 violence, and abuse, and sexual assault.
102 f. Understanding consent.
103 g. Bystander intervention of sexual assault.
104 h. How to safely report a sexual assault.
105 3. For students in grades 6 through 12, awareness of the
106 benefits of sexual abstinence as the expected standard and the
107 consequences of teenage pregnancy.
108 4. Life skills that build confidence, support mental and
109 emotional health, and enable students to overcome challenges,
110 including:
111 a. Self-awareness and self-management.
112 b. Responsible decisionmaking.
113 c. Resiliency.
114 d. Relationship skills and conflict resolution.
115 e. Understanding and respecting other viewpoints and
116 backgrounds.
117 f. For grades 9 through 12, developing leadership skills,
118 interpersonal skills, organization skills, and research skills;
119 creating a résumé, including a digital résumé; exploring career
120 pathways; using state career planning resources; developing and
121 practicing the skills necessary for employment interviews;
122 workplace ethics and workplace law; managing stress and
123 expectations; and self-motivation.
124 5.a. For students in grades 6 through 12, the social,
125 emotional, and physical effects of social media. This component
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1239 2026
126 must include, but need not be limited to, the negative effects
127 of social media on mental health, including addiction; the
128 distribution of misinformation on social media; how social media
129 manipulates behavior; the permanency of sharing materials
130 online; how to maintain personal security and identify
131 cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on the
132 Internet; and how to report suspicious behavior encountered on
133 the Internet.
134 b. The Department of Education shall make available online
135 the instructional material being used pursuant to this
136 subparagraph, and each district school board shall notify
137 parents of its availability.
138
139 Health education and life skills instruction and materials may
140 not contradict the principles enumerated in subsection (3).
141
142 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards
143 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection.
144 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the
145 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is
146 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or
147 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness
148 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u).
149 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1239-00